Hawaii statutes.
§604-5 Civil jurisdiction. (a) Except
as otherwise provided, the district courts shall have jurisdiction in all civil
actions where the debt, amount, damages, or value of the property claimed does
not exceed $40,000, except in civil actions involving summary possession or
ejectment, in which case the district court shall have jurisdiction over any
counterclaim otherwise properly brought by any defendant in the action if the
counterclaim arises out of and refers to the land or premises the possession of
which is being sought, regardless of the value of the debt, amount, damages, or
property claim contained in the counterclaim. Attorney's commissions or fees,
including those stipulated in any note or contract sued on, interest, and
costs, shall not be included in computing the jurisdictional amount. Subject
to subsections (b) and (c), jurisdiction under this subsection shall be
exclusive when the amount in controversy, so computed, does not exceed
$10,000. The district courts shall also have original jurisdiction of suits
for specific performance when the fair market value of such specific
performance does not exceed $20,000 and original jurisdiction to issue
injunctive relief in residential landlord-tenant cases under chapter 521.

(b) The district courts shall try and
determine all actions without a jury, subject to appeal according to law.
Whenever a civil matter is triable of right by a jury and trial by jury is
demanded in the manner and within the time provided by the rules of court, the
case shall be transferred to the circuit court. If the demand is made in the
complaint and the matter is triable of right by a jury, the action may be
commenced in the circuit court if the amount in controversy exceeds $5,000.

(c) The district courts shall have jurisdiction
in all statutory proceedings as conferred by law upon district courts.

(d) The district courts shall not have
cognizance of real actions, nor actions in which the title to real estate comes
in question, nor actions for libel, slander, defamation of character, malicious
prosecution, false imprisonment, breach of promise of marriage, or seduction;
nor shall they have power to appoint referees in any cause. [L 1892, c 57, §10;
am L 1923, c 20, §1; RL 1925, §2274; RL 1935, §3763; am L 1935, c 95, §1; RL
1945, §9674; am L 1953, c 34, §1; RL 1955, §216-4; am L 1957, c 197, §1; am L
1963, c 99, §1; HRS §604-5; am L 1970, c 188, §13; am L 1971, c 144, §1; am L
1975, c 97, §2; am L 1979, c 90, §2; am L 1983, c 238, §1 and c 249, §1; am L
1989, c 37, §2; am L 1994, c 4, §1; am L 1995, c 94, §1; am L 2008, c 69, §1;
am L 2014, c 24, §1]

Rules of Court

Demand for jury trial, see DCRCP rule 38; RCC rule 14; small
claims division, see RSCD rule 7.

Pleading that raises question of title to real estate, see
DCRCP rule 12.1.

Case Notes

Pleading, rigid rules not required. 3 H. 328 (1872); 14 H.
500 (1902); 22 H. 91 (1914); 23 H. 603, 605 (1917); 30 H. 191 (1927). All
essential facts must be shown. 24 H. 16, 19 (1917). Absence of prayer for
process not demurrable. 24 H. 95 (1917).

Trespass, q.c.f., ouster by plea of title. 6 H. 542 (1884);
9 H. 619 (1895); 17 H. 426 (1906). Maintenance of easement. 11 H. 275 (1898);
12 H. 409 (1900). No ouster in action for purchase money, if vendee's
possession undisturbed. 14 H. 280 (1902).

Jury trial allowed on appeal satisfies Seventh Amendment. 14
H. 290, 291 (1902).

Prior to 1903, appeal stayed execution. 14 H. 524 (1902).
Since, magistrate may allow execution, after hearing, unless supersedeas bond
is filed. 15 H. 590 (1904); 15 H. 624 (1904).

Affidavit required by supreme court rule 14 is sufficient if
it sets forth the source, nature, and extent of title claimed by defendant, and
need not set forth source of defendant's predecessors; counter affidavit not
required by rule 14 and should not be considered. 52 H. 246, 473 P.2d 864
(1970).

The "amount of controversy" for purposes of
subsection (b) is the aggregate amount being sought in a complaint by a single
plaintiff against a single defendant, as opposed to the amount alleged as
damages in each individual "count" of a complaint. 90 H. 371, 978
P.2d 809 (1999).

In an ejectment proceeding filed in district court, a
defendant seeking to raise a defense to the court's jurisdiction pursuant to district
court rules of civil procedure rule 12.1, on the ground that the action is one
in which title to real estate will come into question, must set forth in the
affidavit "the source, nature, and extent of the title claimed" with
sufficient detail or specificity to "fully apprise the court of the nature
of" its claim to title of the property in question, and may include any
other particulars; where defendant failed to do so, the district court properly
exercised its jurisdiction. 126 H. 32, 265 P.3d 1128 (2011).

Where sublessee's counterclaim arose out of and referred to
the land or premises the possession of which was being sought, district court
had jurisdiction to decide counterclaim under this section. 86 H. 149 (App.),
948 P.2d 570 (1997).

$20,000 maximum jurisdictional limit not reached where total
amount for which judgment was sought included interest. 92 H. 209 (App.), 990
P.2d 107 (1999).

Where plaintiffs alleged a variety of claims against a
variety of defendants, and minority shareholders had a different number of
shares in the corporation that would have entitled them to different sums of
money if they had prevailed, and plaintiffs' allegation of wrongdoing was not
made on behalf of all of the corporation's shareholders, the circuit court did
not err in ruling that minority shareholders could not aggregate their claims
to meet the jurisdictional minimum. 123 H. 82 (App.), 230 P.3d 382 (2009).

As ownership of a cooperative membership, combined with the
right to occupy a unit in a cooperative project, is a form of property
ownership which has value and constitutes a right of property beyond mere
possession, based on Queen Emma Foundation v. Tingco and subsection (d)'s
limits on the civil jurisdiction of the district court, a cooperative member's
right to occupy their cooperative unit cannot be canceled or terminated in a
district court summary possession action. 125 H. 176 (App.), 254 P.3d 487
(2011).

Jurisdiction. Determined by ad damnum. 3 H. 127, 138 (1869).
Part penalty of bond. 13 H. 695 (1901). Part due on note. 18 H. 412 (1907).
Part due for goods etc., but second action cannot be brought for balance. 14
H. 290 (1902); 14 H. 295 (1902). In determining ad damnum, interest, if prayed
for, should be included, but not statutory attorney's commissions or costs, and
defect not cured by remittitur in appellate court. 14 H. 290, 293 (1902); 15
H. 590 (1904). Attorney's fees provided in note are included. 28 H. 480
(1925). On splitting causes of action. 22 H. 196, 199 (1914); 40 H. 302
(1953). As to previous jurisdictional amount. See 6 H. 656 (1887). Cannot
include interest, attorney's fees, and costs in calculating the jurisdictional
amount. 72 H. 228, 814 P.2d 393 (1991).

Limited jurisdiction. 22 H. 129, 132 (1914). Magistrate
cannot enforce specific performance, having no equity jurisdiction. 10 H. 407
(1896); 11 H. 424 (1898). May appoint next friend. 11 H. 279 (1898). May set
aside judgment and grant rehearing. 15 H. 424 (1904). No presumption in favor
of jurisdiction, liability for exceeding. 4 H. 584 (1883). Action on judgment
for taxes. 18 H. 278 (1907). Plea to jurisdiction goes to whole cause of
action. 24 H. 74, 80 (1917). As to concurrent jurisdiction, etc., see 3 H.
127 (1869); 4 H. 297 (1880). This section applies only to civil cases. 25 H.
556 (1920). Cannot issue alias summons after return day of original has
expired. 25 H. 597, 602 (1920). Because subsection (d) limits civil
jurisdiction of the district court by excluding real actions or actions
involving title to real property, the only court that may take cognizance of
actions seeking cancellation or forfeiture of appellants' leases is the circuit
court. 74 H. 294, 845 P.2d 1186 (1992).

Summary possession. 9 H. 225 (1893). Denial of tenancy and
claim of title ousts jurisdiction. 4 H. 154 (1879); 22 H. 129 (1914). Supreme
court rule 14 prescribes essentials of affidavit, showing source, nature and
extent of title claimed. 18 H. 640 (1908); 21 H. 270 (1912); 22 H. 129 (1914);
23 H. 65, 73 (1915); 24 H. 176 (1918); 24 H. 546, 555 (1918); 29 H. 336 (1926);
30 H. 160 (1927); 37 H. 248 (1945). No evidence necessary to support plea. 12
H. 409 (1900). Hence, judgment of district court, not decisive in subsequent
ejectment. 3 H. 768 (1877). Vendee on mortgage foreclosure as plaintiff. 5
H. 98 (1884). If magistrate errs in sustaining plea of title, circuit court
should remand. 9 H. 636 (1895). Where on appeal to circuit court after a plea
of title on trespass case from district court it is decided the plea has no
merit, case should be remanded to district court. 9 H. 636 (1895).

Cited: 17 H. 598, 599 (1906); 19 H. 346, 347 (1909); 27 H.
631, 635 (1923); 30 H. 445 (1928); 30 H. 560 (1928).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next